Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 5. Blood Tests of Persons Charged with Sex Offenses.

Sec. 18.15.300.
Order for blood test; disclosure of results.

A defendant charged in a criminal complaint, indictment, presentment, or information filed with a magistrate or court with a violation of AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.450

that includes sexual penetration as an element of the offense, or a minor with respect to whom a petition has been filed in a juvenile court alleging a violation of AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.450

that includes sexual penetration as an element of the offense, may be ordered by a court having jurisdiction of the complaint, indictment, information, presentment, or juvenile petition to submit to testing as provided in AS

18.15.300

—

18.15.320

.

An alleged victim listed in the complaint, indictment, information, presentment, or juvenile petition, the parent or guardian of an alleged victim who is a minor or incompetent, or the prosecuting attorney on the behalf of an alleged victim, may petition the court for an order authorized under this section.

Upon receipt of a petition filed under (b) of this section, the court shall determine if (1) probable cause exists to believe that a crime for which a test may be ordered under (a) of this section has been committed, and (2) probable cause exists to believe that sexual penetration took place between the defendant or minor and the alleged victim in an act for which the defendant or minor is charged under (a) of this section. In making the determination, the court may rely exclusively on the evidence presented at a grand jury proceeding or preliminary hearing.

If the court finds probable cause exists to believe that (1) a crime for which a test may be ordered under (a) of this section has been committed, and (2) sexual penetration described in (c)(2) of this section took place, the court shall order that the defendant or minor provide two specimens of blood for testing as provided in AS

18.15.300

—

18.15.320

.

Copies of the blood test results shall be provided to the defendant or minor, each requesting victim, the victim’s designee or, if the victim is a minor or incompetent, the victim’s parents or legal guardian. If the defendant or minor is being incarcerated or detained at the time of the blood test or thereafter, the blood test results shall be provided to the officer in charge and the chief medical officer of the facility in which the defendant or minor is incarcerated or detained, including an incarceration or detention ordered as a result of conviction or judgment of delinquency or child in need of aid for an act for which the defendant or minor is charged under (a) of this section.

A court may not order a test under this section

before seven days after the defendant or minor’s arrest;

after the entry of a disposition favorable to a defendant; or

if the defendant is convicted or adjudicated delinquent or in need of aid, after 90 days after the issuance of the judgment and sentence or of the judgment in a juvenile action.

In this section,

“disposition favorable to the defendant” means an adjudication by a court other than a conviction, or if the defendant is a minor not being prosecuted as an adult, that the minor is not adjudicated delinquent or a child in need of aid, for an offense for which a blood test could be ordered under this section;

“sexual penetration” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900(b)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 SLA 1994)

Sec. 18.15.310.
Testing; test results.

The withdrawal of blood for a test under AS

18.15.300

-

18.15.320

shall be performed in a medically approved manner. Only a physician or physician assistant licensed under AS 08.64, registered or advanced practice registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or certified emergency medical technician may withdraw blood specimens for the purposes of AS

18.15.300

-

18.15.320

.

The court shall order that the blood specimens withdrawn under AS

18.15.300

—

18.15.320

be transmitted to a licensed medical laboratory and that tests be conducted on them for medically accepted indications of exposure to or infection by the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) and other sexually transmitted diseases for which medically approved testing is readily and economically available as determined by the court.

Copies of test results that indicate exposure to or infection by HIV or other sexually transmitted diseases shall also be transmitted to the department.

The test results shall be provided to the designated recipients with the following disclaimer:

The court shall order all persons, other than the test subject, who receive test results under AS

18.15.300

—

18.15.320

to maintain the confidentiality of personal identifying data relating to the test results except for disclosures by the victim, or if the victim is a minor or incompetent by the victim’s parents or legal guardian, as

is necessary to obtain medical or psychological care or advice or to ensure the health of the victim’s spouse, immediate family, persons occupying the same household as the victim, or a person in a dating, courtship, or engagement relationship with the victim;

is necessary to pursue civil remedies against the test subject; or

otherwise permitted by the court.

The specimens and the results of tests ordered under AS

18.15.300

—

18.15.320

are not admissible evidence in a criminal or juvenile proceeding.

A person performing testing, transmitting test results, or disclosing information under AS

18.15.300

—

18.15.320

is immune from civil liability for an act or omission under authority of AS

18.15.300

—

18.15.320

. However, this subsection does not preclude liability for a grossly negligent or intentional violation of a provision of AS 18.15.300 — 18.15.320.

If the results of a blood test conducted under AS

18.15.300

indicate exposure to or infection by HIV or other sexually transmitted diseases for which testing was conducted, the department shall provide (1) free counseling and free testing to a victim for HIV and other sexually transmitted diseases reasonably communicable through the offense; and (2) counseling to the alleged perpetrator or defendant upon request of the alleged perpetrator or defendant. The department shall provide referral to appropriate health care facilities and support services at the request of the victim.

In this section,

“AIDS” means acquired immunodeficiency syndrome or HIV symptomatic disease;

“counseling” means providing a person with information and explanations relating to AIDS and HIV that are medically appropriate for that person, including all or part of the following:

accurate information regarding AIDS and HIV;

an explanation of behaviors that reduce the risk of transmitting AIDS and HIV;

an explanation of the confidentiality of information relating to AIDS diagnoses and HIV tests;

an explanation of information regarding both social and medical implications of HIV tests;

disclosure of commonly recognized treatment or treatments of AIDS and HIV;

“HIV” means the human immunodeficiency virus.

“The tests were conducted in a medically approved manner but tests cannot determine exposure to or infection by HIV or other sexually transmitted diseases with absolute accuracy. Persons receiving this test result should continue to monitor their own health and should consult a physician as appropriate.”

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 SLA 1994; am § 3 ch 91 SLA 1996; am § 31 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (a), inserted “or advanced practice registered” following “registered”.

Collateral references. —

Validity, and propriety under circumstances, of court-ordered HIV testing.
87 ALR5th 631.

Sec. 18.15.320.
Cost of performing test; reimbursement.

The cost of performing a blood test under AS

18.15.300

shall be paid by the department.

If a defendant for whom a blood test has been ordered under AS

18.15.300

is convicted of an offense for which the defendant was charged, and for which a blood test could be ordered under AS

18.15.300

, the court shall order the defendant to reimburse the department for the cost of the test and may order the Department of Corrections to deduct the amount of the test from any pay the inmate receives under AS

33.30.201

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 SLA 1994)